Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6722YH (2) 91 ms/md H.F. 2566 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 384.12A Fire protection and 1 emergency medical services fund. 2 1. If a city provides fire protection or emergency medical 3 service to another city or to a township pursuant to a contract 4 or under an agreement pursuant to chapter 28E, the city shall 5 establish a fire protection and emergency medical services 6 fund. Moneys in the fund shall be used only for costs of 7 providing fire protection and emergency medical services to the 8 other cities or to the portions of such townships outside the 9 corporate limits of the city, as applicable. 10 2. The full amount of moneys received from a township for 11 fire protection or emergency medical services provided pursuant 12 to the contract or agreement under chapter 28E shall be 13 credited to the fire protection and emergency medical services 14 fund. 15 3. The full amount of moneys received from another city 16 under a contract to provide fire protection or emergency 17 medical services or under an agreement pursuant to chapter 28E 18 shall be credited to the fire protection and emergency medical 19 services fund. 20 4. Balances in a fire protection and emergency medical 21 services fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the 22 fund for use under this section in future fiscal years. 23